Ohio, session 136, HB735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.915 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.915. In addition to any other name prescribed by the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number thirteen, between the intersection of that route and Lexington road and the intersection of that route and Beckley road, in Knox county, shall be known as the "William 'Bill' Burgett Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.